Maryland, session 2026, HB0622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Cannabis agent” means an employee, a volunteer, or any other authorized
person who acts for or at the direction of a cannabis licensee or cannabis registrant.
36–401.
(c) (2) A micro license authorizes the holder of the license:
(i) for growers, to operate not more than 10,000 square feet of indoor
canopy or its equivalent, as calculated by the Administration;
(ii) for processors, to process not more than 2,000 pounds of cannabis
per year, as calculated by the Administration; and
(iii) for dispensaries, to operate a delivery service that sells cannabis
or cannabis products without a physical storefront, provided that the licensee employs not
more than [10] 20 employees REGISTERED CANNABIS AGENTS.
(g) Notwithstanding any provisions of this title, the holder of a dispensary license
issued by the Natalie M. LaPrade Medical Cannabis Commission who converts the license
or a registrant with the Natalie M. LaPrade Medical Cannabis Commission may continue
to deliver medical cannabis until July 1, [2026] 2027.
36–407.
(h) An on–site consumption establishment shall:

HOUSE BILL 622 3
(1) require all employees to successfully complete an annual [responsible
vendor] A CANNABIS AGENT training program authorized under this title:
(I) WITHIN 90 DAYS OF A NEW EMPLOYEE’S START DATE; AND
(II) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 2 YEARS; and
(2) ensure that the display and consumption of cannabis or cannabis
products are not visible from outside of the licensed premises.
36–501.
(f) A cannabis licensee shall require each registered cannabis agent to complete
an annual [responsible vendor] A CANNABIS AGENT training program authorized under
this title:
(1) WITHIN 90 DAYS OF THE CANNABIS AGENT’S START DATE AS AN
EMPLOYEE OF OR VOLUNTEER FOR THE CANNABIS LICENSEE; AND
(2) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 2 YEARS.
36–1001.
(a) To offer a responsible medical or adult–use cannabis [vendor, server, and
seller] AGENT training program, a person shall submit an application to the
Administration.
(b) The Administration shall approve the application if the proposed training
program meets the minimum educational standards established under subsection (c) of this
section.
(c) At a minimum, a training program must:
(1) be taught in a classroom or virtual setting for at least a 2–hour period;
(2) establish program standards, including certification and recertification
requirements, record keeping, testing and assessment protocols, and effectiveness
evaluations; and
(3) provide a core curriculum of relevant statutory and regulatory
provisions AS REQUIRED BY REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE ADMINISTRATION,
which shall include:
(i) [information on required licenses, age requirements, patient
registry cards issued by the Administration, maintenance of records, privacy issues, and
unlawful acts;

HOUSE BILL 622
(ii)] administrative and criminal liability and license and court
sanctions;
[(iii)] (II) statutory and regulatory requirements for employees and
owners;
[(iv) statutory and regulatory requirements related to cannabis sale,
transfer, and delivery;
(v) acceptable forms of identification, including patient and
caregiver identification cards;]
[(vi)] (III) State and local licensing and enforcement; and
[(vii) information on serving size, THC and cannabinoid potency, and
impairment]
(IV) PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY STANDARDS RELEVANT TO
EACH LICENSE TYPE.
(D) IN REVIEWING APPLICATIONS FOR APPROVAL OF PROPOSED CANNABIS
AGENT TRAINING PROGRAMS, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL GIVE PRIORITY TO
APPLICATIONS FOR PROGRAMS THAT WERE PREVIOUSLY APPROVED AS
RESPONSIBLE VENDOR TRAINING PROGRAMS.
36–1002.
The Administration shall adopt regulations establishing the [responsible vendor]
CANNABIS AGENT training program and the minimum standards for the program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.